Utah statutes.
16-10a-203.   Incorporation.

(1)  A corporation is incorporated, and its corporate existence begins, when the articles of incorporation are filed by the division, unless a delayed effective date is specified pursuant to Subsection 16-10a-123(2), in which case the incorporation is effective, and the corporate existence begins, on the delayed effective date, unless a certificate of withdrawal is filed prior to the delayed effective date.

(2)  The filing of the articles of incorporation by the division is conclusive proof that all conditions precedent to incorporation have been satisfied, except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

